.deps/ton.LR.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Tongan

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<prn%> ! Pronoun

! Adjective Morphology
%<def%> ! Definite
%<ind%> ! Indefinite
%<sdef%> ! Indefinite

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<du%>  ! Dual

%<det%>  ! Determiner
! Person Morphology
%<p1%>  ! 1st Person
%<p2%>  ! 2nd Person
%<p3%>  ! 3rd Person

! Possession Morphology
%<px1sg%> ! 1st Person singular possesive
%<px2sg%> ! 2nd Person singular possesive
%<px3sg%> ! 3rd Person singular possesive
%<px1pl%> ! 1st Person plural possesive
%<px2pl%> ! 2nd Person plural possesive
%<px3pl%> ! 3rd Person plural possesive

%<emphatic%> ! Emotional Possesion
%<emotional%> ! Emotional Possesion
%<ordinary%> ! Ordinary Possesion

! Verb Tenses
%<past%> ! Past
%<pres%> ! Present
%<fti%>  ! Future Indicative
%<imp%>  ! Imperative
%<aux%>  ! Auxiliry verb
%<cl%>   ! Classifier
%<pr%>   ! Preposition
%<neg%>   ! Negation
%<vaux%>   ! Aux verb


! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%{'%}   ! Glottal stop consonant
%<emph%> ! emphasizing
%<fredu%> ! Full reduplication
%<predu%> ! Partial reduplication
%<az%> ! Adjectivizer
%<excl%> ! Exclusive
%<incl%> ! Inclusive
%<ind%> ! Inclusive
%<prepd%> ! Preposed
%<postd%> ! Postposed
%<sent%> ! Sentence
%<poss%> ! Sentence

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

NounRoot ;
AdjRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
CardPrnRoot ;
PossPrnRoot ;
PluralClassifiers ;
Punctuation ;
AdverbRoot ;
PrepRoot ;

LEXICON RegNounInfl

%<n%>: # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<du%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON AdvInfl
%<adv%>: # ;



LEXICON AdjInfl

%<adj%>: # ;


LEXICON Neg
%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON AdjEmph

%<adj%>%<emph%>: # ;

LEXICON VerbInfl

%<v%> : # ;

LEXICON CardPrnInfl


%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<pres%>%<excl%>%<sg%>: ou # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<past%>%<excl%>%<du%>:u # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<fti%>%<excl%>%<pl%>: ku # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>: ma # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>: mau # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>: te # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>: ta # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>: tau # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: ke # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p2%>%<du%>: mo # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: mou # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: ne # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p3%>%<du%>: na # ;
%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: nau # ;

%<prn%>%<postd%>%<pl%>%<excl%>%<sg%>: au # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>: kimaua # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>: kimautolu # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>: kita # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>: kitaua # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>: kitautolu # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: koe # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p2%>%<du%>: kimoua # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: kimoutolu # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: ia # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p3%>%<du%>: kinaua # ;
%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: kinautolu # ;

LEXICON OtherPrn
%<prn%>: hai # ;

LEXICON PrepInfl

%<pr%>: # ;

LEXICON Det

%<det%>: # ;


LEXICON PossPrnIrr
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<emotional%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ordinary%>: # ;
! %<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: # ;

LEXICON PossPrnInfl

! Indefinite possessive pronouns

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: haku # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: hama # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻama # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: hamau # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻamau # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: hato # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: siʻato # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: hata # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻata # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: hatau # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻatau # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: hao # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: siʻao # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p2%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: hamo # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p2%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻamo # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: hamou # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻamou # ;


%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: hano # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: siʻano # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p3%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: hana # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p3%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻana # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: hanau # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<ind%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻanau # ;

! Definite possessive pronouns

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: hoku # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: siʻoku # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: homa # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻoma # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: homau # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻomau # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: hoto # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: siʻoto # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: hota # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻota # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: hotau # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻotau # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: ho # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: siʻo # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p2%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: homo # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p2%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻomo # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: homou # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻomou # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<ordinary%>: hono # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<emotional%>: siʻano # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<du%>%<ordinary%>: hona # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<du%>%<emotional%>: siʻona # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<ordinary%>: honau # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<def%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<emotional%>: siʻonau # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<sg%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻoku # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻomaua # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻomautolu # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻota # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻotaua # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻotautolu # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻona # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p2%>%<du%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻonauau # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻonautolu # ;

%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻou # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p3%>%<du%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻomoua # ;
%<prn%>%<poss%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<emphatic%>: hoʻomoutolu # ;


LEXICON PluralMarkersInfl

%<cl%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON DualMarkersInfl
%<cl%>%<du%>: # ;


LEXICON AuxVerbPast
%<vaux%>%<past%>: # ;

LEXICON AuxVerbPres
%<vaux%>%<pres%>: # ;

LEXICON AuxVerbFut
%<vaux%>%<fti%>: # ;

LEXICON VerbRegImp
%<v%>%<imp%>: # ;

LEXICON RegArticle

%<def%>: # ;
%<ind%>: ha # ;

LEXICON SDefArticle
%<sdef%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PossPrnRoot
siʻaku:siʻaku PossPrnIrr ; ! my cherished
haku:haku PossPrnIrr ; ! my cherished
haku: PossPrnInfl ; ! my
hama: PossPrnInfl ; ! my (dual)
siʻama: PossPrnInfl ; ! my cherished (dual)
hamau: PossPrnInfl ; ! my plural
siʻamau: PossPrnInfl ; ! my plural
hao: PossPrnInfl ; ! your
siʻao: PossPrnInfl ; ! your cherished
hamo: PossPrnInfl ; ! your (two)
siʻamo: PossPrnInfl ; ! your cherished (two)
hamou: PossPrnInfl ; ! your plural
siʻamou: PossPrnInfl ; ! your plural
hano: PossPrnInfl ; ! their
siʻano: PossPrnInfl ; ! their cherished
hana: PossPrnInfl ; ! their (two)
siʻana: PossPrnInfl ; ! their cherished (two)
hanau: PossPrnInfl ; ! their (pl)
siʻanau: PossPrnInfl ; ! their cherished (two)
hato: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻato: PossPrnInfl ; !
hata: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻata: PossPrnInfl ; !
hatau: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻatau: PossPrnInfl ;
hoku: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻoku: PossPrnInfl ; !
homa: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻoma: PossPrnInfl ; !
homau: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻomau: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoto: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻoto: PossPrnInfl ; !
hota: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻota: PossPrnInfl ; !
hotau: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻotau: PossPrnInfl ; !
ho:ho PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻo: PossPrnInfl ; !
homo: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻomo: PossPrnInfl ; !
homou: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻomou: PossPrnInfl ; !
hono: PossPrnInfl ; !
hona: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻona: PossPrnInfl ; !
honau: PossPrnInfl ; !
siʻonau: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻoku: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻomaua: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻomautolu: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻota: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻotaua: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻotautolu: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻona: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻonauau: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻonautolu: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻou: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻomoua: PossPrnInfl ; !
hoʻomoutolu: PossPrnInfl ; !
